District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.19

Reasonable prices.

(a)

A contracting officer may request factual information reasonably available to the contractor or prospective contractor to substantiate that the price or cost offered, or some portion of it, is reasonable.

(b)

The CPO shall establish a process for determining the reasonableness of prices.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 419, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-354.18.